Virginia statutes. Title 24.2. Elections.
Article 1. General Provisions.

§ 24.2-955.
Scope of disclosure requirements.

The disclosure requirements of this chapter apply to any sponsor of an advertisement in the print media, on radio or television, or placed or promoted for a fee on an online platform, the cost or value of which constitutes an expenditure or contribution required to be disclosed under Chapter 9.3 (§

24.2-945

et seq.) except that the disclosure requirements of this chapter do not apply to (i) an individual who makes independent expenditures aggregating less than $1,000 in an election cycle for or against a candidate for statewide office or less than $200 in an election cycle for or against a candidate for any other office or (ii) an individual who incurs expenses only with respect to a referendum.

History.

2002, c. 487, §

24.2-941

; 2006, cc. 787, 892; 2008, c. 825; 2020, c. 551.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 825 substituted “or against a candidate for statewide office or less than $200 in an election cycle for or against a candidate for any other office” for “a candidate” in clause (i).

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 551 inserted “or placed or promoted for a fee on an online platform” and made stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For 2006 survey article, “Election Law,” see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 121 (2006).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

“Conduct of elections.” —

Regulations implementing Chapters 9.3, 9.4, and 9.5 of Title 24.2 do not relate to “the conduct of elections and eligibility to vote,” and therefore do not qualify for an exemption from the regulatory process established by the Virginia Administrative Process Act. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Edgardo Cortes, Commissioner of Elections, No. 14-038, 2014 Va. AG LEXIS 56 (10/1/14).

§ 24.2-955.1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Advertisement”
means any message appearing in the print media, on television, on radio, or on an online platform, that constitutes a contribution or expenditure under Chapter 9.3 (§

24.2-945

et seq.). “Advertisement” shall not include novelty items authorized by a candidate including, but not limited to, pens, pencils, magnets, and buttons to be attached to wearing apparel.

means the same as “authorization” as defined in “Authorized by ” §

24.2-945.1

.

Click to view

“Campaign telephone calls”
means a series of telephone calls or text messages, electronic or otherwise, made (i) to 25 or more telephone numbers in the Commonwealth, (ii) during the 180 days before a general or special election or during the 90 days before a primary or other political party nominating event, (iii) conveying or soliciting information relating to any candidate or political party participating in the election, primary or other nominating event, and (iv) under an agreement to compensate the telephone callers.

“Candidate”
means “candidate” as defined in §

24.2-101

.

“Candidate campaign committee”
or

“campaign committee”

means “campaign committee” as defined in §

24.2-945.1

.

“Coordinated”
or

“coordination”

means an expenditure that is made (i) at the express request or suggestion of a candidate, a candidate’s campaign committee, or an agent of the candidate or his campaign committee or (ii) with material involvement of the candidate, a candidate’s campaign committee, or an agent of the candidate or his campaign committee in devising the strategy, content, means of dissemination, or timing of the expenditure.

“Conspicuous”
means so written, displayed, or communicated that a reasonable person ought to have noticed it.

“Full-screen”
means the only picture appearing on the television screen during the oral disclosure statement that (i) contains the disclosing person, (ii) occupies all visible space on the television screen, and (iii) contains the image of the disclosing person that occupies at least 50% of the vertical height of the television screen.

“Independent expenditure”
means “independent expenditure” as defined in §

24.2-945.1

.

“Name of candidate”
means (i) the full name of the candidate as it appears on the statement of qualification filed pursuant to §

24.2-501

or as it will appear on the ballot or (ii) the first name, middle name, or “nickname” of the candidate as it appears on his statement of qualification and a last name of the candidate as it appears on his statement of qualification.

“Occurrence”
means one broadcast of a radio or television political campaign advertisement.

“Online platform”
means any public-facing website, web application, or digital application, including a social network, ad network, or search engine, that sells advertisements.

“Online political advertisement”
means an advertisement that is placed or promoted for a fee on an online platform.

“Online political advertiser”
means any person who purchases an advertisement from an online platform or promotes an advertisement on an online platform for a fee.

“Political action committee”
means “political action committee” as defined in §

24.2-945.1

.

“Political committee”
means “political committee” as defined in §

24.2-945.1

.

“Political party”
has the same meaning as “party” or “political party” as defined in §

24.2-101

.

“Political party committee”
means any state political party committee, congressional district political party committee, county or city political party committee, or organized political party group of elected officials. The term shall not include any other organization or auxiliary associated with or using the name of a political party.

“Print media”
means billboards, cards, newspapers, newspaper inserts, magazines, printed material disseminated through the mail, pamphlets, fliers, bumper stickers, periodicals, websites, electronic mail, non-video or non-audio messages placed or promoted for a fee on an online platform, yard signs, and outdoor advertising facilities. If a single print media advertisement consists of multiple pages, folds, or faces, the disclosure requirement of this section applies only to one page, fold, or face.

“Radio”
means any radio broadcast station that is subject to the provisions of 47 U.S.C. §§ 315 and 317.

“Scan line”
means a standard term of measurement used in the electronic media industry calculating a certain area in a television advertisement.

“Sponsor”
means a candidate, candidate campaign committee, political committee, or person that purchases an advertisement.

“Telephone call”
means any single telephone call or text message, electronic or otherwise, that when combined with other telephone calls or text messages constitutes campaign telephone calls.

“Television”
means any television broadcast station, cable television system, wireless-cable multipoint distribution system, satellite company, or telephone company transmitting video programming that is subject to the provisions of 47 U.S.C. §§ 315 and 317.

“Unobscured”
means that the only printed material that may appear on the television screen is a visual disclosure statement required by law, and that nothing is blocking the view of the disclosing person’s face.

“Yard sign”
means a sign paid for or distributed by a candidate, campaign committee, or political committee to be placed on public or private property. Yard signs paid for or distributed prior to July 1, 2015, shall not be subject to the provisions of §§

24.2-956

and

24.2-956.1

.

History.

2002, c. 487, § 24.2-942; 2003, c. 237; 2006, cc. 787, 892; 2015, c. 573; 2020, cc. 551, 554, 615.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2006, c. 769 amended former § 24.2-942, from which this section is derived. The amendments were substantially included within §

24.2-955.1

as enacted by Acts 2006, cc. 787 and 892.

Acts 2020, c. 615, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2021.”

Acts 2020, c. 615, cl. 3 provides: “That print media advertisements paid for or distributed prior to the effective date of this act [January 1, 2021] shall not be subject to the provisions of this act.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 573 inserted “yard signs” in the definition for “Print media” and added the definition for “Yard sign.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 551, in the definition of “Advertisement,” inserted “or on an online platform”; added the definitions of “Online platform,” “Online political advertisement” and “Online political advertiser”; and in the definition of “Print media,” substituted “websites, electronic mail, non-video or non-audio messages placed or promoted for a fee on an online platform” for “website, electronic mail” and made stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendment by c. 554 in the definition of “Campaign telephone calls,” inserted “or text messages”; and inserted definition for “Telephone call.”

The 2020 amendment by c. 615, effective January 1, 2021, added the definition for “Name of candidate.”

§ 24.2-955.2.
Publications not to receive compensation for advocating candidacy; penalties.

It shall be unlawful for any owner, proprietor, editor, manager, officer, clerk, agent, reporter, or employee of any newspaper, magazine, or periodical printed or published in this Commonwealth to accept or receive or agree to accept or receive, for himself or another, any money or other valuable consideration for such newspaper, magazine, or other periodical supporting or advocating the election or defeat of any candidate. But nothing in this section shall prevent any person, firm, or corporation engaged in the publication of any newspaper, magazine or periodical from receiving from any person compensation for printing and publishing any matter, article or articles advocating the election or defeat of any candidate, if a statement, “Paid Advertisement,” appears in plain type in boldface Roman capitals in a conspicuous place at the beginning of the matter or article and the matter or article otherwise complies with the provisions of this chapter.

The person accepting a “Paid Advertisement” for the newspaper, magazine or periodical shall require, and for one year shall retain a copy of, proof of the identity of the person who submits the advertisement for publication when the authorization statement on the advertisement is made pursuant to this chapter by an individual or entity other than a candidate, candidate campaign committee, political party committee, or political action committee. Proof of identity shall be submitted either (i) in person and include a valid Virginia driver’s license, or any other identification card issued by a government agency of the Commonwealth, one of its political subdivisions, or the United States, or (ii) other than in person, in which case, the person submitting the advertisement shall provide a telephone number and the person accepting the advertisement may phone the person to verify the validity of the person’s identifying information before publishing the advertisement. Any candidate clearly identified in the advertisement is entitled to the name of the person who submitted the advertisement after the publication of the advertisement in the newspaper, magazine, or periodical.

Any such owner, proprietor, editor, manager, officer, clerk, agent, reporter, or employee violating the provisions of subsection A or B shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed $50; and, in the case of a willful violation, he shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor. The procedure to enforce the civil penalty provided in this section shall be as stated in Article 8 (§

24.2-953

et seq.) of Chapter 9.3.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-406; 1952, c. 4; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-276; 1991, c. 709; 1993, c. 641, §

24.2-1013

; 2001, c. 747; 2002, c. 487; 2006, cc. 787, 892; 2008, c. 825.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, a reference correction was made in subsection C.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 825 added the last sentence in subsection B; and substituted “Article 8 of Chapter 9.3” for “article 8 of chapter 9.3” in the last sentence in subsection C.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

13B M.J. Newspapers, § 5.

§ 24.2-955.3.
Penalties for violations of this chapter.

Any sponsor violating Article 2 (§

24.2-956

et seq.) shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed $25,000. In the case of a willful violation, he is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

Any sponsor violating Article 3 (§

24.2-957

et seq.) or 4 (§

24.2-958

et seq.) shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed $25,000. In the case of a willful violation, he is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor. In no event shall the total civil penalties imposed for multiple broadcasts of one particular campaign advertisement exceed $25,000.

Any person violating Article 5 (§

24.2-959

et seq.) shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed $25,000, and in the case of a willful violation, he is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor. A violation of the provisions of Article 5 shall not void any election.

The State Board, in a public hearing, shall determine whether to find a violation of this chapter and to assess a civil penalty. At least 10 days prior to such hearing, the State Board shall send notice by certified mail to persons whose actions will be reviewed at such meeting and may be subject to civil penalty. Notice shall include the time and date of the meeting, an explanation of the violation, and the maximum civil penalty that may be assessed.

It shall not be deemed a violation of this chapter if the contents of the disclosure legend or statement convey the required information.

Any civil penalties collected pursuant to an action under this section shall be payable to the State Treasurer for deposit to the general fund. The procedure to enforce the civil penalties provided in this section shall be as stated in §

24.2-946.3

.

History.

2002, c. 487, §§ 24.2-943, 24.2-944; 2003, c. 237; 2004, cc. 55, 457; 2005, c. 369; 2006, cc. 787, 892; 2010, c. 546; 2022, c. 744.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2006, cc. 791 and 802 amended former §§ 24.2-943 and 24.2-944. The amendments were substantially incorporated into §

24.2-955.3

as enacted by Acts 2006, cc. 787 and 892.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 546 inserted “et seq.” in subsection A; inserted clause (i) designator in subsection B; inserted “(§

24.2-959

et seq.)” in subsection C; inserted subsection D; and redesignated former subsections D and E as subsections E and F.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 744 rewrote subsections A, B, and C.

Law Review.

For annual survey article, “Election Law and Government,” see 46 U. Rich. L. Rev. 119 (2011).